Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-3009
Right to reimbursement and agreement
under act; not transferable; exception.

(1) The right to job training reimbursements
and the agreement under the Teleworker Job Creation Act shall not be transferable
except when a project covered by an agreement is transferred by sale or lease
to another employer or in an acquisition of assets qualifying under section
381 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

(2) The acquiring
employer, as of the date of notification of the director of the completed
transfer, shall be entitled to any unused job training reimbursements and
to any future job training reimbursements allowable under the act.

Laws 2010, LB1081, § 9.